District of Columbia statutes.
22-1839

Reputation or opinion evidence.

In a criminal case in which a person is accused of trafficking in commercial sex, as prohibited by § 22-1833, sex trafficking of children, as prohibited by § 22-1834, or benefitting financially from human trafficking, as prohibited by § 22-1836, reputation or opinion evidence of the past sexual behavior of the alleged victim is not admissible. Evidence of an alleged victim’s past sexual behavior other than reputation or opinion evidence also is not admissible, unless such evidence other than reputation or opinion evidence is admitted in accordance with § 22-3022(b), and is constitutionally required to be admitted.

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 109, 57 DCR 5405